Georgia statutes. TITLE 45 Public Officers and Employees
Article 3 Appointments and Vacancies

45-12-50.
Duty to appoint officers and fill vacancies.

The Governor shall appoint all officers and fill all vacancies unless otherwise prescribed by the Constitution and laws of this state. All appointments to discharge a public duty by the General Assembly, or by the Governor under its authority, are offices within the meaning of the Constitution of Georgia.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 72; Code 1868, § 66; Code 1873, § 69; Code 1882, § 69; Civil Code 1895, § 132; Civil Code 1910, § 155; Code 1933, § 40-301.

Cross references.

Power of Governor to fill vacancies in office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. II, Para. VIII.

Call by Governor of special election to fill vacancy created by recall election, §

21-4-13

.

Authority of Governor to appoint qualified persons to state examining boards notwithstanding laws requiring appointment of nominees of private organizations or associations to such boards, §

43-1-14

.

Vacating of public offices, T. 45, C. 5.

Law reviews.

For article discussing control of tenure of executive officers by the president and the Governor, see 3 Ga. B.J. 13 (1941).

For article discussing appointment and removal power of Governor, see 14 Ga. B.J. 171 (1951).

For comment on Rogers v. Medical Ass’n,

244 Ga. 151

,

259 S.E.2d 85

(1979), invalidating Georgia statute requiring Governor’s appointments to Composite State Board of Medical Examiners (now Georgia Composite Medical Board) be made solely from nominees submitted by state medical society as an unconstitutional delegation of legislative authority to a private organization, see 29 Emory L.J. 1183 (1980).

45-12-51.
General power to engage services of any person.

The Governor shall have the power to engage the services of any competent person for the discharge of any duty required by the laws and essential to the interests of the state or necessary, in an emergency, to preserve the property or funds of the state.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 75; Code 1868, § 69; Code 1873, § 74; Code 1882, § 74; Civil Code 1895, § 136; Civil Code 1910, § 159; Code 1933, § 40-305.

45-12-52.
Filling of vacancies when advice and consent of Senate required; interim appointment.

In case of a vacancy from any cause in any office, the full term of which, by the Constitution of Georgia, is to be filled by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate, the Governor shall appoint and commission some qualified person to fill the vacancy until the next meeting of the General Assembly, when said vacancy shall be filled in the manner described in the Constitution of Georgia for filling the full term of such office. All existing vacancies and all vacancies which may occur during the session of the General Assembly shall be filled pursuant to this Code section.

Where it shall be incumbent upon the Governor to appoint a public officer subject to confirmation of or by and with the advice and consent of the Senate, the office shall be deemed vacant at the expiration of the term of such officer, and he shall not hold over until his successor shall have been appointed and confirmed. The Governor may make an appointment to fill such vacancy ad interim; and the appointee shall hold office until the Senate shall next convene, at which time the Governor shall submit an appointment to fill such vacancy to the Senate for confirmation. The appointee, if confirmed, shall hold over until the expiration of the term for which he was appointed; provided, however, that the Governor shall not appoint ad interim any person previously rejected by the Senate. Whenever the Senate is in session, the Governor shall submit the names of appointees to fill all vacancies which will occur within eight months after the date fixed for the convening of the Senate.

History.

Ga. L. 1871-72, p. 284, § 1; Code 1873, § 70; Code 1882, § 70; Civil Code 1895, § 133; Civil Code 1910, § 156; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 116; Code 1933, § 40-302.

Cross references.

Power of Governor to fill vacancies in office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. V, Sec. II, Para. VIII.

Public officers holding over, §

45-2-4

.

45-12-53.
Appointments not subject to Senate confirmation.

No appointment by the Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate unless the statute under which such appointment is made requires confirmation or confirmation is otherwise required by law.

History.

Ga. L. 1941, p. 289, § 2.

Law reviews.

For article discussing control of tenure of executive officers by the president and the Governor, see Ga. B.J. 13 (1941).

45-12-54.
Appointments to boards, commissions, and bureaus subject to Senate confirmation.

All appointments made by the Governor to boards, commissions, and bureaus created and established by the laws of this state shall be made subject to confirmation by the Senate. It shall be the duty of the Governor to submit to the Senate the names of all such appointees appointed prior to the convening of the General Assembly or during the session, either regular or special, of the General Assembly. Unless such appointees are confirmed by the Senate, they shall cease to hold the office to which they have been appointed, and the name of another appointee to fill such office shall be immediately submitted by the Governor to the Senate.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 208, § 1.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Status of Administrative Agencies under the Georgia Constitution,” see 40 Ga. L. Rev. 1109 (2006).

45-12-55.
Governor authorized to appoint attorneys as executive counsel; compensation.

The Governor shall be authorized to appoint attorneys to serve as his or her executive counsel for such periods of time as he or she deems advisable. The salaries, expenses, and all other remunerations of the attorneys appointed by the Governor as his or her executive counsel shall be determined by the Governor and paid from funds appropriated to or otherwise made available to the office of the Governor.

History.

Ga. L. 1967, p. 102, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 879, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 797, § 1.

45-12-56.
Appointment of secretaries and clerical personnel; compensation.

The Governor shall have power to appoint his own secretaries and to provide such other clerical personnel as may be required in his office. The salaries and compensation of secretaries and clerical personnel so appointed shall be paid from funds appropriated for such purposes.

History.

Code 1882, § 5119; Civil Code 1895, § 5822; Civil Code 1910, § 6488; Code 1933, § 40-304; Ga. L. 1973, p. 665, § 1.

45-12-57.
Governor’s messenger — Authority to appoint; compensation.

The Governor, in his discretion, may appoint a messenger for the office of the Governor or may have that duty performed by some other state employee engaged by him under the general authority granted to him.

The salary of a messenger appointed by the Governor shall be $950.00 per annum. If the duty is performed by some other state employee engaged by the Governor, it shall be done without additional compensation.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, §§ 120, 1572; Code 1868, §§ 115, 1634; Code 1873, §§ 124, 1640; Code 1882, §§ 124, 1640; Civil Code 1895, §§ 144, 282; Civil Code 1910, §§ 167, 317; Code 1933, §§ 40-306, 40-307; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 45.

45-12-58.
Governor’s messenger — Duties.

The messenger shall perform such duties for the office of the Governor and for other state officers and such other service connected with the state business at the capitol as the Governor shall prescribe and he shall be governed by such rules and regulations as the Governor may adopt.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 121; Code 1868, § 116; Code 1873, § 125; Code 1882, § 125; Civil Code 1895, § 145; Civil Code 1910, § 168; Code 1933, § 40-308.

45-12-59.
Governor’s messenger — Special messenger.

Where there is no messenger or where the duty cannot be performed by the person acting as messenger, the Governor, if necessary, may employ some person, for a reasonable compensation, to perform any service which is the duty of a messenger.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 122; Code 1868, § 117; Code 1873, § 126; Code 1882, § 126; Civil Code 1895, § 146; Civil Code 1910, § 169; Code 1933, § 40-309.

45-12-60.
Payment of compensation of persons whose compensation not prescribed.

All persons who are employed by the Governor but for whom no compensation is prescribed shall be paid, at his discretion, out of the money appropriated therefor. If no money shall be thus appropriated and the employment shall be indispensable, he shall pay them out of any contingent funds.

History.

Orig. Code 1863, § 1573; Code 1868, § 1635; Code 1873, § 1641; Code 1882, § 1641; Civil Code 1895, § 283; Civil Code 1910, § 318; Code 1933, § 40-312.

45-12-61.
Campaign contributions and judicial appointments.

As used in this Code section, the terms “campaign committee,” “contribution,” and “expenditure” shall have the meanings set forth in Code Section 21-5-3.

No person shall be eligible for appointment to fill a vacancy on the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeals, the superior courts, or the state courts if such person has made a contribution to or expenditure on behalf of the Governor or the Governor’s campaign committee either: (1) in the 30 day period preceding the vacancy, unless the person requests and is provided a refund of such contribution or reimbursement for such expenditure; or (2) on or after the date the vacancy occurs.

History.

Code 1981, §

45-12-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 27/HB 48.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2005, p. 859, § 28, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the provisions of that Act do not apply to any violation occurring prior to January 9, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2005 enactment of this Code section, see 22 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 119 (2005).